Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.140

Lapsing of appropriations.

All appropriations shall lapse at the end of the fiscal period for which the appropriations are made to the extent that they have not been expended or lawfully obligated.

[ 1981 c 270 s 9; 1965 c 8 s 43.88.140. Prior: 1959 c 328 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1981 c 270: See notes following RCW 43.88.010.